Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 39 Governmental Claims
§ 1-39-108.
Liability; public utilities.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by the negligence of public employees while acting within the scope of their duties in the operation of public utilities and services including gas, electricity, water, solid or liquid waste collection or disposal, heating and ground transportation.

The liability imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section does not include liability for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by a failure to provide an adequate supply of gas, water, electricity or services as described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Housing inspection not within waiver of immunity. —

A housing inspection is not one of the enumerated public utility or ground transportation service exceptions to the waiver of immunity. Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991).

Licensing authorities not included in waiver. —

This section does not, within its language, include the authorities that license the public employees or entities that provide gas, electric, transportation and other listed services. Thus, the enforcement of this state's financial responsibility laws by employees of the department of revenue and taxation, financial responsibility division, is not included in the waiver of immunity articulated by this section. Gibson v. State, 811 P.2d 726,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1991).

Municipal fire-training exercise not included in waiver. —

Because a municipal fire-training exercise is not specifically listed as one of the public utility or service exceptions to the waiver of immunity, immunity is available as a defense in such situations. City of Cheyenne v. Huitt, 844 P.2d 1102,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1993).

City not negligent in requiring iron pipe. —

The court properly granted summary judgment for a city, where the plaintiff's claim asserted that the city council was negligent in adopting an ordinance which required the use of an iron pipe in a water system, which proved over time to be unsatisfactory or perhaps even ill-considered. The claim did not fit the niche provided by subsection (a), nor was it one which fell within the statutory exceptions to the general immunity provided for in §

1-39-104

.Sawyer v. Sheridan, 793 P.2d 476,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1990).

Operation of public utilities. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-108

waives immunity for the negligence of public employees in the operation of public utilities and services including, solid or liquid waste collection or disposal. In other words, the statute waives immunity for negligence in keeping a public utility operable or functional.
City of Torrington v. Cottier, 2006 WY 145, 145 P.3d 1274,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2006).

Because a city's negligence in failing to ascertain ownership of property before installing a storm drain was unrelated to the operation and function of the storm drain, it did not constitute negligence in the operation of a public utility.
Sinclair v. City of Gillette, 2012 WY 19, 270 P.3d 644,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2012).

Exception to governmental immunity for negligence in the operation of a public utility did not apply to a school district since the district's provision of ground transportation by busses, which allegedly contributed to the death of a student passenger, was not operation of a public utility, even though it served a public interest. Sperry v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 6, 84 F. Supp. 3d 1277, 2015 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13910 (D. Wyo. 2015).

Waiver of sovereign immunity did not apply to a former state employee's defamation claim because the claim did not rest on any actions involved in keeping a landfill operable or functional, but instead arose from the termination of the employee's employment. Armstrong v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 674 Fed. Appx. 842, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 179 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 175, 199 L. Ed. 2d 103, 2017 U.S. LEXIS 5892 (U.S. 2017).

Wyoming Department of Transportation’s performance of eye exams was not a public service for which governmental immunity had been waived by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-108

as performing eye exams was not the same as the listed services, and the fact that the discrete service of performing eye exams was also available through private parties did not defeat immunity. Archer v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2018 WY 28, 413 P.3d 142,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2018).

City did not provide a public service for which governmental immunity had been waived by §

1-39-108

when it provided a marked street crossing given the specific exclusion set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-30-120(a). Archer v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2018 WY 28, 413 P.3d 142,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2018).

Cited

in

Boyd v. Nation, 909 P.2d 323,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1996); Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 12, 2011); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of municipal corporation for spread of fire purposely and lawfully kindled, 24 ALR2d 241.

Liability of municipalities for pollution of subterranean waters, 38 ALR2d 1265.

Municipal liability for maintenance of public dump as nuisance, 52 ALR2d 1134.

Allowance of damages to successful plaintiff or relator in mandamus, 73 ALR2d 903, 34 ALR4th 457.

Liability of governmental unit for injuries or damage resulting from tree or limb falling onto highway from abutting land, 95 ALR3d 778.

Recovery of exemplary or punitive damages from municipal corporation, 1 ALR4th 448.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury, death, or property damage resulting from defect or obstruction in shoulder of street or highway, 19 ALR4th 532.

Municipal liability for negligent performance of building inspector's duties, 24 ALR5th 200.

§ 1-39-109.
Liability; medical facilities.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by the negligence of public employees while acting within the scope of their duties in the operation of any public hospital or in providing public outpatient health care.

The state of Wyoming is solely liable for damages resulting from, and the sole responsible party for, bodily injury or wrongful death to a patient treated under the provisions of W.S.

35-31-101

through

35-31-103

caused by the negligence of a health care provider or a medical facility while performing health care services pursuant to a contract to deliver volunteer health services under W.S.

35-31-101

through

35-31-103

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 2018 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added designation (a) and inserted "Except as provided in subsecction (b) of this section, a; and added (b).

Construction. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-39-109

and

1-39-110

may overlap but each statute covers actors the other does not; as a result, interpreting §

1-39-110

to apply to ordinary negligence claims does not render §

1-39-109

superfluous, and that §§ 1-39-109 and 1-39-110 may overlap does not necessarily produce an absurd result. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Employee of covered entity. —

Wrongful death, medical malpractice, and negligence claims against a psychologist and the state hospital were improperly dismissed where the complaint sufficiently alleged that the psychologist was acting within the scope of her duties when she improperly diagnosed, treated, and monitored the decedent while he was a patient at the hospital, thereby falling within the Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-39-109(a) exception to sovereign immunity. Craft v. State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Health, 2020 WY 70, 465 P.3d 395,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2020).

Employee of independent contractor. —

District court improperly denied a government hospital's motion for partial summary judgment in a medical malpractice action arising from the actions of a nurse employed by a contracted anesthesia services provider because the nurse was not a “public employee” for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and the Act did not provide an express waiver of sovereign immunity for non-employees of a governmental hospital; the district court erred in reading a prior appellate decision as implicitly waiving sovereign immunity against governmental entities for acts of ostensible or apparent agents. Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2014).

Malpractice claim based on lost chance doctrine. —

Under the lost chance doctrine, a negligent act must be a substantial cause of the lost chance to survive, and the damages awarded must be fully apportioned; therefore, medical malpractice claims using the doctrine are within the protection afforded by this section. McMackin v. Johnson County Healthcare Ctr., 2004 WY 44, 88 P.3d 491,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited

in

Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 12, 2011); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015).

Beavis v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 2001 WY 32, 20 P.3d 508,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 ALR4th 858.

Liability of mental care facility for suicide of patient or former patient, 19 ALR4th 7.

Hospital's liability for mentally deranged patient's self-inflicted injuries, 36 ALR4th 117.

Liability of hospital or clinic for sexual relationships with patients by staff physicians, psychologists and other healers, 45 ALR4th 289.

Recovery in death action for failure to diagnose incurable disease which caused death, 64 ALR4th 1232.

§ 1-39-110.
Liability; health care providers.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by the medical malpractice of health care providers who are employees of the governmental entity, including contract physicians, physician assistants, nurses, optometrists and dentists who are providing a service for state institutions or county jails, while acting within the scope of their duties.

Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-118(a), for claims under this section against a physician, physician assistant, nurse, optometrist or dentist who is employed by a governmental entity or who is deemed to be a public employee of the state by virtue of a contract pursuant to W.S.

35-31-101

through

35-31-103

, based upon an act, error or omission occurring on or after May 1, 1988, the liability of a governmental entity shall not exceed the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) to any claimant for any number of claims arising out of a single transaction or occurrence nor exceed the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) for all claims of all claimants arising out of a single transaction or occurrence.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1988, ch. 45, § 1; 1989, ch. 21, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1990, ch. 2, § 1; 2007, ch. 212, § 1; 2018 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) inserted “physician assistants, nurses, optometrists and dentists” following “including contract physicians” and inserted “or county jails” preceding “while acting within the”; in (b) inserted “physician assistant, nurse, optometrist or dentist” following “this section against a physician”, substituted “a governmental entity” for “the state of Wyoming” preceding “based upon an act”, substituted “a governmental entity” for “the state” following “May 1, 1988, the liability of.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), inserted “who is” following “optometrist or dentist” and “or who is deemed to be a public employee of the state by virtue of a contract pursuant to W.S.

35-31-101

through

35-31-103

” prior to “based upon act.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “medical malpractice” for “negligence” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, Ch. 212, § 3 states as follows: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Construction. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-39-109

and

1-39-110

may overlap but each statute covers actors the other does not; as a result, interpreting §

1-39-110

to apply to ordinary negligence claims does not render §

1-39-109

superfluous, and that §§ 1-39-109 and 1-39-110 may overlap does not necessarily produce an absurd result. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Construction with Medical Review Panel Act. —

While the Medical Review Panel Act applies to health care providers, it, unlike the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, explicitly refers to malpractice claims as the claims subject to its provisions, and the use of the term “malpractice claims” in the Medical Review Panel Act demonstrates the legislature knew how to limit the scope of a statute to malpractice claims; it did not include any such limitation in the statute, and the supreme court is not at liberty to read one into it. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Waiver of governmental immunity not limited to medical malpractice claims. —

District court properly denied a hospital summary judgment based on the statute because the statute’s waiver of governmental immunity was not limited to medical malpractice claims; the statute waives immunity for the “negligence” of health care providers, and nothing in the plain language of the statute suggests the legislature intended to limit it to medical malpractice. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Liability for negligence of corrections officials. —

State of Wyoming was improperly granted summary judgment on the inmate’s negligence claim because it could not be concluded that there was no genuine issue of material fact as to whether the State, through the acts or omissions of the corrections officials, was liable for negligence. Bird v. Lampert, 839 Fed. Appx. 218, 2020 U.S. App. LEXIS 39317 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2020).

Employee of independent contractor. —

District court improperly denied a government hospital's motion for partial summary judgment in a medical malpractice action arising from the actions of a nurse employed by a contracted anesthesia services provider because the nurse was not a “public employee” for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and the Act did not provide an express waiver of sovereign immunity for non-employees of a governmental hospital; the district court erred in reading a prior appellate decision as implicitly waiving sovereign immunity against governmental entities for acts of ostensible or apparent agents. Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2014).

Government employees who inspect elevator for disabled person
not “health care provider.” —

Employees of the division of vocational rehabilitation, which procured and inspected an elevator on behalf of a multiple sclerosis victim, were not “health care providers.” This exception, therefore, does not apply and the claim of the victim, who suffered injuries when the elevator malfunctioned, against the division was barred. Troyer v. Department of Health & Social Servs., Div. of Vocational Rehabilitation, 722 P.2d 158,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 589

(Wyo. 1986).

Social case workers are not “health care providers”

within the meaning of this section and §

1-12-601

. They are, therefore, granted immunity by this chapter. May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993).

Malpractice claim based on lost chance doctrine. —

Under the lost chance doctrine, a negligent act must be a substantial cause of the lost chance to survive, and the damages awarded must be fully apportioned; therefore, medical malpractice claims using the doctrine are within the protection afforded by this section. McMackin v. Johnson County Healthcare Ctr., 2004 WY 44, 88 P.3d 491,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited

in

Beavis v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 2001 WY 32, 20 P.3d 508,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2001); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015).

Quoted in

Stroth v. N. Lincoln County Hosp. Dist., 2014 WY 81,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Jun 23, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Immunity of municipal corporation from liability for damages in tort in operating hospital, 25 ALR2d 203, 18 ALR4th 858.

Governmental tort liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 6 ALR4th 1155.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by activities of hospital “rescue team”, 64 ALR4th 1200.

§ 1-39-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986,
ch. 89, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1, related to liability arising from the operation of public facilities.

§ 1-39-112.
Liability; peace officers.

A governmental entity
is liable for damages resulting from tortious conduct of peace officers
while acting within the scope of their duties.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1986, ch. 74, § 2.

Cross references. —

General powers of governing bodies, see §

15-1-103

.

Cases should rarely be disposed of by Rule 12(b)(6) dismissal.
—

Considering the requirements for qualified immunity and their definitions, cases involving the defense of qualified immunity should rarely be disposed of by Rule 12(b)(6) dismissal. Darrar v. Bourke, 910 P.2d 572,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1996).

Unlike absolute immunity, a determination that qualified immunity is generally available to peace officers is not sufficient to sustain a motion to dismiss. The defense of qualified immunity presents mixed questions of fact and law. These questions are better suited for resolution at the summary judgment stage of the proceedings after the facts are sufficiently developed. Darrar v. Bourke, 910 P.2d 572,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1996).

Applicability of section. —

Without a determination that the officers were not acting within the scope of their duties or that their conduct was not tortious, the governmental entity does not escape liability for the tortious acts of its peace officers. Darrar v. Bourke, 910 P.2d 572,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1996).

Where a plaintiff
appealed a district court's entry of a judgment on the pleadings
in
favor of defendants, since his claim did not fall within one of
the
statutorily authorized exceptions to governmental immunity, his
claim
was barred that defendants committed an unreasonable seizure
in violation
of the Wyoming Constitution. Stone v. Simone, 610 Fed. Appx. 751, 2015 U.S. App. LEXIS 7203 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2015).

No respondeat superior actions. —

A governmental entity cannot be held liable under 42 USCS § 1983 on a respondeat superior theory. Kimbley v. Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

Police officers are not immune from liability if they negligently drive patrol car.

De Wald v. State, 719 P.2d 643,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1986).

Police officer setting up roadblock. —

In an action arising from an automobile accident which occurred when a fleeing suspect crashed into the plaintiffs' vehicle just after it cleared a roadblock set up to stop the fleeing suspect, a defendant police officer was not entitled to immunity since none of the decisions made by the officer were of an executive, policy nature. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bassett, 8 P.3d 1079,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2000).

Sheriff could have owed a duty to have arrested intoxicated
driver. —

Trial court erred in dismissing a wrongful death action brought by mother against sheriff and county, on behalf of her son who was killed by an intoxicated driver; after determining that the intoxicated driver immediately intended to drive to follow an ambulance to the hospital to be with an injured friend, the sheriff had a duty to do what an ordinarily prudent law enforcement officer would have done under like circumstances.
Becker v. Mason, 2006 WY 143, 145 P.3d 1268,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2006).

Highway patrolman allegedly negligent in not sanding icy road
not immune from suit. —

A highway patrolman, who was allegedly negligent in not having an icy road sanded after being called to the scene of an accident, was not immune from suit under § 1-39-104(a), even though this section refers only to a “governmental entity.” His immunity was purely dependent upon the immunity of the state. His protection was found not in immunity, but in the duty of the state under § 1-39-104(b) to provide him a defense and to indemnify him. State v. Dieringer, 708 P.2d 1,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1985).

Liability of off-duty police officer responding to emergency
bulletin. —

Plaintiff in wrongful death action may prevail only if plaintiff has alleged sufficient facts to establish that off-duty police officer was acting within his scope of duties at the time he responded to an emergency bulletin. Duncan v. Town of Jackson, 903 P.2d 548,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1995).

In wrongful death action, if the trier of fact determined that off-duty police officer was not acting within the scope of his official duties, then the municipality and the police officer would be insulated from liability under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. If, however, the trier of fact determined that the officer was acting within the scope of his official duties and was authorized to act at the accident scene, and that he, therefore, owed a legal duty to the deceased, liability should be determined as it would be in any negligence case. Duncan v. Town of Jackson, 903 P.2d 548,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1995).

Officer not negligent in failing to conduct more extensive
sobriety testing. —

An officer was not negligent in failing to conduct more extensive sobriety testing on an intoxicated driver who injured another where informal sobriety tests conducted on the driver did not indicate that the driver was legally intoxicated. That an intoxicated driver or other law violator causes injury to another does not, without more, necessarily mean that a governmental entity or public employee was negligent. Keehn ex rel. Keehn v. Town of Torrington, 834 P.2d 112,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1992).

Action against parole board and officers not maintainable.
—

A cause of action against the parole board and its officers for permitting a parolee to leave the state, after which he committed various murders, could not be maintained, as the defendants were not “law enforcement officers” and, hence, were not subject to claim or liability because of governmental immunity. Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985).

Even though the legislature has not given the phrase “law enforcement officers” a statutory definition, the unambiguous language of this section plainly does not waive tort immunity for parole officers or county attorneys, persons who are not “law enforcement officers” as defined in Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985).

Action against parole officer for alleged perjury. —

The trial court properly refused a probation officer's dismissal motion of claims against him on the basis of qualified immunity because a reasonable probation officer would have known that the perjury of the sort he allegedly committed violated § 6-5-301(a). Park County v. Cooney, 845 P.2d 346,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1992), cert. denied, White v. Cooney, 510 U.S. 813, 114 S. Ct. 60, 126 L. Ed. 2d 30, 1993 U.S. LEXIS 4946 (U.S. 1993).

State penitentiary training officer. —

A training officer acting within the scope of his employment at a state penitentiary enjoys immunity from suit under this act. Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994).

Agriculture department employees not “law enforcement officers.”
—

Wyoming department of agriculture employees charged with administering the Wyoming Wholesome Meat Act of 1969 were not “law enforcement officers,” where they were not charged with traditional peace-keeping duties and had no power to maintain public order, to carry a weapon, or to hold or arrest persons accused of violating the act. Matthews v. Wyoming Dep't of Agric., 719 P.2d 216,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 554

(Wyo. 1986).

Game and fish personnel serving as bear management officers

were not performing the functions of a “peace officer” and thus the officers' alleged negligence in monitoring a grizzly bear who mauled a hunter did not give rise to liability under this section. Peterson v. Wyoming Game And Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

Public duty rule. —

Public duty only rule, if it ever was recognized in Wyoming, is no longer viable. Natrona County v. Blake, 2003 WY 170, 81 P.3d 948,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Lafferty v. Nickel, 663 P.2d 168,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1983); Metz v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2007 WY 166, 173 P.3d 334,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Oct. 23, 2007).

Quoted

in

Hill v. Park County ex rel. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 856 P.2d 456,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1993); Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Feb. 9, 2010).

Cited

in

May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993); Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 2014 WL 46689 (Jan 7, 2014); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of governmental unit or its officers for injury to innocent occupant of moving vehicle, or for damage to such vehicle, as result of police chase, 4 ALR4th 865.

Immunity of public officer from liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 5 ALR4th 773.

Governmental tort liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 6 ALR4th 1155.

Liability of governmental officer or entity for failure to warn or notify of release of potentially dangerous individual from custody, 12 ALR4th 722.

Municipal or state liability for injuries resulting from police roadblocks or commandeering of private vehicles, 19 ALR4th 937.

Liability for failure of police response to emergency call, 39 ALR4th 691.

Liability for false arrest or imprisonment under warrant as affected by mistake as to identity of person arrested, 39 ALR4th 705.

Liability of police or peace officers for false arrest, imprisonment or malicious prosecution as affected by claim of suppression, failure to disclose or failure to investigate exculpatory evidence, 81 ALR4th 1031.

Performance of public duty by off-duty police officer acting as private security guard, 65 ALR5th 623.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection from crime, 90 ALR5th 273.

Admissibility of showing, in action in federal court under 42 USCS § 1983 based on conduct of police officers, that criminal charges brought against plaintiff in connection with incident giving rise to action were dismissed or that plaintiff was acquitted on some or all charges. 143 ALR Fed 621.

Construction and application of Federal Tort Claims Act provision
(28 USC § 2680(h)) excepting from coverage claims arising out of false
imprisonment, false arrest, malicious prosecution, or abuse of process
152 ALR Fed 605.